Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.060

When sentence begins to run.

When a convicted person seeks appellate review of his or her conviction and is at liberty on bond pending the determination of the proceeding by the supreme court or the court of appeals, credit on his or her sentence will begin from the date such convicted person is returned to custody. The date of return to custody shall be certified to the department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, and the prosecuting attorney of the county in which such convicted person was convicted and sentenced, by the sheriff of such county. If such convicted person does not seek review of the conviction, but is at liberty for a period of time subsequent to the signing of the judgment and sentence, or becomes a fugitive, credit on his sentence will begin from the date such convicted person is returned to custody. The date of return to custody shall be certified as provided in this section. In all other cases, credit on a sentence will begin from the date the judgment and sentence is signed by the court.

[ 1999 c 143 s 18; 1988 c 202 s 15; 1981 c 136 s 36; 1979 c 141 s 1; 1971 c 81 s 46; 1967 c 200 s 10; 1955 c 133 s 7. Prior: 1947 c 92 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. s10249-2, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.